Connecticut, session 2026, HB05295.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The state military
readiness center in Putnam shall be named the John N. Dempsey
Putnam National Guard Readiness Center in honor of John N.
Dempsey, who served as mayor of and state representative for the town
of Putnam and as the eighty-first governor and captain-general of
Connecticut.
Sec. 2. Section 17 of public act 26-35 is repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026